Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2413
Combined improvements; acceptance; special assessments; levy; maturity.

On the completion and acceptance of the improvement or improvements made under the Combined Improvement Act, the mayor and city council or the village board of trustees may cause special assessments to be levied against the property in the district specially benefited by the improvement or improvements to the extent that such property is specially benefited in the manner and form provided for levying special assessments for street improvements under the provisions of sections 16-617 to 16-655 or 17-509 to 17-515, and the special assessments shall mature and bear interest the same as provided for special assessments for paving.

Laws 1961, c. 64, § 6, p. 254;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 152.